tools/fst/lexicon.lexc
! Cumulative lexicon for doc/fst-analyzer-plan.md's FST prototype. Grows
! one morpheme/mechanism at a time (e.g. "aki+nga", then "amit+juq", ...)
! as one lexicon rather than staying split into one file per word, so
! each new word's roots/affixes/rules are also checked against everything
! validated so far -- not just tested in isolation.
!
! Tag/canonical-text convention: a morpheme's own canonical form and its
! signature id are joined by a single "+" (Benoit's {surface:canonical/id}
! "/" role); "++" marks the boundary to the next morpheme (Benoit's "}{"
! role). Every morpheme -- root or affix -- echoes its own canonical text
! into the tag stream, even when (as with "nga" here) surface and canonical
! happen to be identical: keeping one uniform shape for every entry avoids
! a special-cased "sometimes the text is there, sometimes it isn't" rule
! that a future output-format conversion script would need to know about.
! See phonology.xfscript's header for why a bare "/" itself is avoided
! (xfst replace-rule context operator).
!
! lexc convention: upper side = analysis (root/affix + tags), lower side =
! pre-phonology intermediate form. This compiles as a *generator*; the
! analyser direction used by hfst-lookup is produced by composing with
! phonology.xfscript's rules and then inverting -- see that file's header
! for the exact build commands.

Multichar_Symbols +1n +1v +1vn +1nv +1nn +1c +1e +1a +1p +1q +1vv +2vn
  +tn-nom-s-4s +tn-dat-p +tv-ger-3p +tn-nom-p +tn-dat-s +tn-acc-p
  +tn-nom-p-4s +tn-loc-s +tn-abl-p +tn-gen-s +tn-loc-p +tn-acc-s
  +tn-dat-p-4s +tv-ger-1s +tv-dec-1s +tn-via-p +tv-part-1s-3s-prespas
  +2vv +tn-abl-p-4s +tv-part-1s-3p-prespas +2nn +tn-loc-p-4s +2nv
  +tv-dec-1p +tn-nom-s-4p +tv-ger-1p +tv-caus-1s +tv-caus-1p +tv-caus-2s
  +tv-ger-2s +tn-sim-p +tv-imp-2s +tv-caus-4s +tn-via-s-4s +tn-nom-d
  +tv-part-1s-3s-fut +tv-dec-3s +tv-part-3p +&iq +tn-abl-s
  ++ SUPPR VVNG NASAL PMARK DECAP VOICE MINSERT TNNOMD JGUARD KGUARD

LEXICON Root
Nouns ;
Verbs ;
Conjunctions ;
Exclamations ;
Adverbs ;
Pronouns ;

! Bulk-generated roots (tools/fst/generate_roots.py, from RootsSpalding.csv/
! RootsSchneider.csv/Pronouns.csv) live in separately-named lexicons, not
! merged into the hand-picked ones above: hfst-lexc refuses to compile the
! same LEXICON name defined across two files ("Sublexicon defined more than
! once"). Each one converges on the same downstream continuation lexicons
! as its hand-picked counterpart (e.g. NounsGenerated's entries -> the same
! NounContinuations as Nouns's), so a generated root reaches every
! applicable suffix/ending class exactly like a hand-picked one does.
NounsGenerated ;
VerbsGenerated ;
ConjunctionsGenerated ;
ExclamationsGenerated ;
AdverbsGenerated ;
PronounsGenerated ;
DemonstrativeAdverbsGenerated ;
DemonstrativePronounsGenerated ;
DemonstrativeAdverbRootsGenerated ;
DemonstrativePronounRootsGenerated ;

! The demonstrative pronoun/adverb system (tools/fst/generate_demonstratives.py
! -- see that script's own docstring for the full investigation) is an
! entire root+ending category, not an extension of an already-partially-
! wired mechanism: Demonstratives.csv's 65 rows give either a STANDALONE
! complete word (own Root entry point, e.g. "tamanna" = "this one",
! reachable from DemonstrativeAdverbsGenerated/DemonstrativePronounsGenerated)
! or a ROOT that takes a case ending from Endings_demonstrative.csv (a
! SEPARATE Root entry point, e.g. "taakku"+"ninga" = "taakkuninga",
! reachable from DemonstrativeAdverbRootsGenerated/
! DemonstrativePronounRootsGenerated) -- both forms come from the SAME CSV
! row, confirmed by reverse-engineering the tag shapes real gold ids use
! (MorphAnalGoldStandard_Hansard.kt has both "tamannali" =
! {tamanna:tamanna/pd-ml-s}{li:li/1q} and "taakkuninga" =
! {taakku:taakku/rpd-sc-p}{ninga:ninga/tpd-acc-p}, same underlying row
! backing each). No phonology at all: neither source CSV has an action
! column, so every entry is plain concatenation.
!
! Verified via histogram.py + a snapshot_correct.py diff: zero
! regressions, and the bulk generation's own breadth reached well beyond
! the handful of words individually tested. Two accepted false positives,
! both understood, not new bug classes: "taaksumunga" -- its OWN gold
! entry's canonical ("taangna") is the dictionary/morpheme form, unlike
! every other demonstrative gold word (which all use the CSV's "root"
! column as canonical, matching this generator's own choice; also the
! only gold string in this whole corpus with an odd duplicated-prefix
! formatting quirk) -- treated as a probable gold-data anomaly, not a
! reason to special-case the generator against every other word's
! pattern. "ukunani" -- an unrelated, not-yet-implemented verb root "uku"
! (+"nani"/tv-part-3s) accidentally spells the same string as the
! demonstrative root "uku"+"nani"/tpd-loc-p -- the same cross-lexical
! shadowing risk already documented and accepted throughout this file
! (e.g. nunalik/uqausiq/kiinaujaq), not specific to demonstratives.

! Noun root + terminal noun ending, straight concatenation, no
! phonological alternation: "akinga" = {aki:aki/1n}{nga:nga/tn-nom-s-4s}.
